Massachusetts, session 194th, H1827.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 160 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 253. (a) Any police report involving a railroad fatality and all communications
between police officers and railroad crew members involved in such fatality shall not be made
public and shall be maintained by the police department that responds to such fatality in a
manner that shall ensure confidentiality; provided, however, that all such reports shall be
accessible at all reasonable times, upon written request, to (i) the host railroad, (ii) the railroad of
employ of any employee mentioned in such reports and (iii) any other person authorized by
judicial order to obtain such information if access to such report is necessary in the performance
of their duties; and provided further, that all such reports shall be accessible at all reasonable
times, upon written or electronic mail request to law enforcement officers, district attorneys or
assistant district attorneys.
of 2

(b) Communications between police officers and railroad employees concerning any
railroad fatality incident may be shared with any person listed in subsection (a) if such access is
necessary to the performance of their duties.
(c) A violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 1 year
or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or both.
of 2